New Jersey, session 222, S3786.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: 1[Access Link means the paratransit service implemented by the New Jersey Transit Corporation for purposes of complying with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.), and any regulations promulgated thereunder.]1 Operator means an operator who is actively engaged in operating 1[an Access Link] a1 vehicle 1for the provision of paratransit services1. 1Paratransit service means any transportation service other than fixed route transportation service, including, but not limited to, paratransit services provided by:  the New Jersey Transit Corporation through Access Link, as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2016, c.25 (C.27:25-5c); the Department of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1987, c.455 (C.34:16-51 et seq.); and counties under the Senior Citizen and Disabled Resident Transportation Assistance Act, P.L.1983, c.578 (C.27:25-25 et seq.).  Paratransit service does not include private or charter services provided by taxicabs, limousines, or transportation network companies as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2).1 b.    An operator 1[of an Access Link vehicle]1 shall announce, or cause to be announced by a recording system, every scheduled stop along the vehicles route. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment.